Nevada, session 83, AB1.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. The regulations adopted by the Colorado River
Commission of Nevada which are codified as NAC 321.100 to
321.230, inclusive, are hereby declared void. In preparing
supplements to the Nevada Administrative Code on or after the
effective date of this act, the Legislative Counsel shall remove those
regulations.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)